el: Τύπος απλικατέρ γκλος χειλιών: Βούρτσα; Σφουγγάρι μαξιλαράκι; Ραβδί σε σχήμα οπλής; Μεταλλική ψυκτική άκρη; Pen; Πιθάρι; Rollerball; Άκρη σιλικόνης; Άκρη σωληναρίου συμπίεσης; Στικ; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип апликатор на гланца за устни: Четка; Кушън гъба; Пръчка тип еленово копитце; Метален охлаждащ връх; Електронна цигара; Гърне; Ролер; Силиконов връх; Връх на изстискваща тубичка; Стик; Други
tr: Dudak parlatıcı aplikatör tipi: Fırça; Yastık sünger; Doe-foot aplikatör; Metal soğutma ucu; Kalem; Tencere; Bilyeli kalem; Silikon uç; Sıkma tüpü ucu; Sap; Diğer
hu: Szájfényapplikátor típusa: Ecset; Párnás szivacs; Őzláb pálca; Fém hűtőhegy; Karám; Edény; Görgős toll; Szilikon hegy; Préselt tubus hegy; Rúd; Egyéb
fi: Huulikiillon levitintyyppi: Sivellin; Tyynysieni; Doe-foot-applikaattori; Metallinen jäähdyttävä kärki; Karsina; Purkki; Kuula; Silikonikärki; Puristusputken kärki; Tikku; Muu
sl-SI: Tip aplikatorja za sijaj za ustnice: Krtačna; Blazinasta gobica; Aplikator v obliki stopala; Kovinska hlajena konica; Pisalo; Lonec; Rollerball; Silikonska konica; Stisljiva tuba; Palica; Drugo
pt-BR: Tipo de aplicador de gloss labial: Pincel; Esponja almofadada; Aplicador doe-foot; Ponta metálica refrescante; Cercado; Panela; Esferográficas; Ponta de silicone; Ponta de tubo squeeze; Vareta; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul aplicatorului pentru luciu de buze: Perie; Burete pernă; Aplicator doe-foot; Vârf metalic răcitor; Țarc; Cupă; Cu bilă; Vârf de silicon; Vârf de tub presat; Baton; Altele
hr-HR: Tip aplikatora sjajila za usne: Četkica; Jastučić spužvica; Doe-foot štapić; Metalni vrh za hlađenje; Ograda; Lonac; Roler kemijska olovka; Silikonski vrh; Vrh tube za istiskivanje; Stik; Ostalo
lt-LT: Lūpų blizgesio aplikatoriaus tipas: Šepetėlis; Pagalvėlės kempinėlė; Lūpų blizgio aplikatorius; Metalinis vėsinantis antgalis; „Pen“ geležtė; Puodas; Rašalinis šratinukas; Silikoninis antgalis; Tūbelės spaudžiamas antgalis; Lazdelė; Kita
en: Lip gloss applicator type: Brush; Cushion sponge; Doe-foot wand; Metal cooling tip; Pen; Pot; Rollerball; Silicone tip; Squeeze tube tip; Stick; Other
es: Tipo de aplicador de brillo labial: Pincel; Esponja cushion; Varita doe-foot; Punta metálica refrigerante; Redil; Maceta; Bolígrafo de bola; Punta de silicona; Punta de tubo exprimible; Palillo; Otros
ja: リップグロスのアプリケータータイプ: ブラシ; クッションスポンジ; ドーフットワンド; メタルクーリングチップ; ペン; ポット; ローラーボール; シリコーンチップ; スクイーズチューブチップ; スティック; その他
fr: Type d’applicateur du brillant à lèvres: Brosse; Éponge coussin; Baguette pied de biche; Embout métallique refroidissant; Enclos; Pot; À bille roulante; Embout silicone; Embout tube pressable; Bâton; Autre
it: Tipo di applicatore del lucidalabbra: Pennello; Spugna a cuscinetto; Applicatore a piedino; Punta metallica rinfrescante; A penna; Vaso; A sfera; Punta in silicone; Punta del tubetto; Stick; Altro
sk-SK: Typ aplikátora lesku na pery: Štetec; Vankúšiková špongia; Aplikátor v tvare kopýtka; Kovový chladiaci hrot; Ohrada; Hrniec; Guľôčkový; Silikónový hrot; Stláčacia tuba; Tyčinka; Iné
nb: Påførertype for leppeglans: Børste; Putesvamp; Doe-foot-stav; Kjølende metallspiss; Penn; Gryte; Rollerball-penn; Silikonspiss; Klemtubespiss; Pinne; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de aplicador de gloss labial: Pincel; Esponja cushion; Aplicador doe-foot; Ponta metálica refrescante; Caneta; Panela; Rollerball; Ponta de silicone; Ponta de tubo de apertar; Taco; Outro
de: Lipgloss-Applikatortyp: Bürste; Kissenschwamm; Doe-Foot-Stab; Metallkühlspitze; Pen; Becher; Tintenroller; Silikonspitze; Tubenspitze; Stick; Sonstiges
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์ทาลิปกลอส: แปรง; ฟองน้ำคูชั่น; หัวโดฟุต; หัวโลหะเย็น; คอก; หม้อ; ปากกาโรลเลอร์บอล; หัวซิลิโคน; หลอดบีบ; แท่ง; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại dụng cụ bôi son bóng: Cọ; Mút đệm; Đũa đầu thoa; Đầu kim loại làm mát; Bút; Hũ nhỏ; Bi mực lỏng; Đầu silicone; Đầu tuýp bóp; Nén; Khác
zh-TW: 唇彩塗抹器類型: 畫筆; 氣墊海綿; 鹿蹄型刷頭; 金屬冷卻頭; 筆刀; 鍋; 鋼珠筆; 矽膠頭; 擠壓管頭; 棒狀; 其他
zh-CN: 唇彩涂抹器类型: 刷子; 气垫海绵; 海绵头棒; 金属冷却头; 小窝; 锅; 滚珠笔; 硅胶头; 挤压管头; 棒/棍/签; 其他
sv: Läppglansapplikatortyp: Borste; Kuddesvamp; Doe-foot-stav; Metallisk kylspets; Hage; Kastrull; Bläckpenna; Silikonspets; Klämtubsspets; Stift; Övrigt
ru: Тип аппликатора блеска для губ: Кисть; Кушон-губка; Аппликатор-лапка; Металлический охлаждающий наконечник; Загон; Горшок; Шариковая ручка; Силиконовый наконечник; Тюбик с наконечником; Стик; Другой
da: Lipgloss-applikatortype: Børste; Pudesvamp; Doe-foot-stav; Metal kølespids; Indelukke; Gryde; Rullekuglepen; Silikonespids; Klemmetubespids; Pind; Andet
nl: Lipglossapplicatortype: Borstel; Kussenspons; Doe-foot staaf; Metalen koelpunt; Kooi; Pot; Rollerball; Siliconenpunt; Knijptubepunt; Stick; Andere
ko: 립글로스 어플리케이터 유형: 브러시; 쿠션 스펀지; 도우풋 완드; 메탈 쿨링 팁; 펜; 냄비; 수성 볼펜; 실리콘 팁; 스퀴즈 튜브 팁; 막대; 기타
pl: Typ aplikatora błyszczyka: Pędzel; Gąbka poduszkowa; Aplikator stopkowy; Metalowa chłodząca końcówka; Kojec; Słój; Rollerball; Silikonowa końcówka; Końcówka tubki do wyciskania; Przypnij; Inne
cs: Typ aplikátoru lesku na rty: Štětec; Polštářková houbička; Aplikátor typu laní nožka; Kovový chladicí hrot; Kapesní; Hrnec; Roller; Silikonový hrot; Stlačovací tuba; Tyčinka; Jiné